Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.630

Registration information of members of cooperatives to produce and process medical cannabis.

(1) Registration information submitted to the state liquor and cannabis board under RCW 69.51A.250 including the names of all participating members of a cooperative, copies of each member's recognition card, location of the cooperative, and other information required for registration by the state liquor and cannabis board is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

(2) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Cooperative" means a cooperative established under RCW 69.51A.250 to produce and process cannabis only for the medical use of members of the cooperative.

(b) "Recognition card" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 69.51A.010.

[ 2022 c 16 s 31; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1002.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—Intent—Effective dates—2015 2nd sp.s. c 4: See notes following RCW 69.50.334.